Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.246

Prescriptions—Labels—Cover or cap to meet safety standards—Penalty.

(1) To every box, bottle, jar, tube or other container of a prescription which is dispensed there shall be fixed a label bearing the name and address of the dispensing pharmacy, the prescription number, the name of the prescriber, the prescriber's directions, the name and strength of the medication, the name of the patient, the date, and the expiration date. The security of the cover or cap on every bottle or jar shall meet safety standards adopted by the commission. At the prescriber's request, the name and strength of the medication need not be shown. If the prescription is for a combination medication product, the generic names of the medications combined or the trade name used by the manufacturer or distributor for the product shall be noted on the label. The identification of the licensed pharmacist responsible for each dispensing of medication must either be recorded in the pharmacy's record system or on the prescription label. This section shall not apply to the dispensing of medications to in-patients in hospitals.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2013 c 19 s 18; 2003 c 53 s 136; 2002 c 96 s 1; 1984 c 153 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 99 s 1; 1939 c 28 s 2; RRS s 6154-2. Formerly RCW 18.67.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.